District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.09

Operation of District Quarry.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 892, ch. 1406
April 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 406, 44 DCR 1423

History

1981 Ed., § 1-1114.
1973 Ed., § 1-811.

Prior Codifications